Washington statutes.
RCW 43.332.010

Office created—Duties.

(1) The office of the Washington state trade representative is created in the office of the governor. The office shall serve as the state's official liaison with foreign governments on trade matters.

(2) The office shall:

(a) Work with the department of commerce, the department of agriculture, and other appropriate state agencies, and within the agencies' existing resources, review and analyze proposed and enacted international trade agreements and provide an assessment of the impact of the proposed or enacted agreement on Washington's businesses and firms;

(b) Provide input to the office of the United States trade representative in the development of international trade, commodity, and direct investment policies that reflect the concerns of the state of Washington;

(c) Serve as liaison to the legislature on matters of trade policy oversight including, but not limited to, updates to the legislature regarding the status of trade negotiations, trade litigation, and the impacts of trade policy on Washington state businesses;

(d) Work with the international trade division of the department of commerce and the international marketing program of the Washington state department of agriculture to develop a statewide strategy designed to increase the export of Washington goods and services, particularly goods and services from small and medium-sized businesses; and

(e) Conduct other activities the governor deems necessary to promote international trade and foreign investment within the state.

(3) The office shall prepare and submit an annual report on its activities under subsection (2) of this section to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature.

[ 2023 c 470 s 2083; 2003 c 346 s 2; 1995 c 350 s 2.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2023 c 470: See note following RCW 10.99.030.